District of Columbia statutes.
29-703.01

Becoming limited partner.

(a)

A person becomes a limited partner:

(1)

Upon formation as provided in the partnership agreement; or

(2)

After formation, a person becomes a limited partner:

(A)

As provided in the partnership agreement;

(B)

As the result of a merger under subchapter X of this chapter or a transaction under Chapter 2 of this title;

(C)

With the consent of all the partners; or

(D)

As provided in § 29-708.01(4).

(b)

A person may become a limited partner without:

(1)

Acquiring a transferable interest; or

(2)

Making or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited partnership.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(4)(A), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-701.02.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 301 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.